Washington statutes.
RCW 7.105.240

Appointment of counsel for petitioner.

Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, or as provided through alternative sources including, but not limited to, grants, local funding, or pro bono means, the court may appoint counsel to represent the petitioner if the respondent is represented by counsel.

[ 2021 c 215 s 32.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2022 c 268; 2021 c 215: See note following RCW 7.105.900.